Utah statutes.
61-2e-306.   Removal of appraiser from appraisal panel.

Except within the first 30 days after the day on which an appraiser is first added to the appraiser panel of an appraisal management company, an appraisal management company may not remove the appraiser from its appraiser panel, or otherwise refuse to assign a request for a real estate appraisal activity to an appraiser without:

(1)  notifying the appraiser in writing of:

(a)  the reason why the appraiser is being removed from the appraiser panel of the appraisal management company; and

(b)  the nature of the alleged conduct or violation if the appraiser is being removed from the appraiser panel for:

(i)  illegal conduct; or

(ii)  a violation of the applicable appraisal standards; and

(2)  providing an opportunity for the appraiser to respond to the notification of the appraisal management company.



Enacted by Chapter 269, 2009 General Session

